South Carolina, session 2025-2026, H5526.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of South Carolina: SECTION 1.  As of the effective date of this joint resolution, no governmental entity of this State, county, municipality, or a political subdivision thereof, shall accept any application or permit for a data center, nor take action on any permit or application for a data center which has not received final approval, until the General Assembly establishes a comprehensive oversight and approval process for new data centers in this State. For purposes of this section, "data center" means a facility, campus of facilities, or array of interconnected facilities in this State used by an entity or other business enterprise to operate, manage, or maintain a computer, group of computers, or other organized assembly of hardware and software for the primary purpose of storing, retrieving, or transmitting data and that has a peak demand of five megawatts or greater. SECTION 2.  This joint resolution takes effect upon approval by the Governor. ----XX----